Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-92] Owner-occupancy requirement.
(a) An eligible borrower shall use the dwelling unit purchased under this
subpart as the eligible borrower's permanent and primary residence.

(b) From time to time, the corporation may
submit a verification of owner-occupancy form to the eligible borrower.
Failure to respond to this verification in a timely manner may result in an
immediate escalation of the interest rate or acceleration of the eligible loan.

(c) For eligible borrowers in the process of
selling or transferring title to their property, the corporation may grant a
waiver of subsection (a) for a period not to exceed three years and for reasons
set forth in section 201H-49 on a case-by-case basis. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next